Nebraska, session 109, LB770.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB770 LB770
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 33-114, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
33-114 Each county treasurer shall receive for and on behalf of the
county for services rendered to other governmental subdivisions and
agencies, when fees for services rendered by him or her are not otherwise
specifically provided, the following fees: (1) On all sums of money
collected by him or her for each fiscal year, two percent of the sums so
collected; (2) for the collection of all sums of money, general or
bonded, of drainage, irrigation, or natural resources districts, one
percent of the sums so collected; (3) for the collection of all ad
valorem taxes and special assessments, general or bonded, of sanitary and
improvement districts, reclamation districts, or county agricultural
societies, two percent of the sums so collected; (4) for the collection
of all sums of money for municipal taxes, general or special, including
money for bond sinking fund or bond interest fund and school money, one
percent of the sums so collected; and (5) for the collection of all sums
of money for special assessments for municipal improvements, one and one-
half percent of the sums so collected.
On all sums collected, such percentage shall be allowed but once. In
computing the amount collected for the purpose of charging percentage,
all sums from whatever fund derived shall be included together, except
the school fund. The treasurer shall be paid in the same proportion from
the respective funds of the state collected by him or her whether the
funds are in money or state warrants.
Sec. 2. Section 77-6204, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-6204 (1) After retaining one percent of all revenue received from
the Department of Revenue pursuant to section 77-6203 for costs, the The
county treasurer shall distribute the remaining all revenue received from
the Department of Revenue pursuant to section 77-6203 as follows:
(a) Five percent of such revenue shall be distributed to the
-2-

LB770 LB770
2026 2026
community college area in which the renewable energy generation facility
is located; and
(b) The remainder of such revenue shall be distributed to local
taxing entities which, but for such personal property tax exemption,
would have received distribution of personal property tax revenue from
depreciable personal property used directly in the generation of
electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel
source.
(2) A local taxing entity's status as eligible for distribution
under subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall not be affected when and
if the net book value of personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source becomes zero. A local taxing entity's status as eligible
for distribution under such subdivision shall be affected by the disposal
of all of the exempt depreciable personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source.
(3) The distribution to each eligible local taxing entity under
subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall be calculated by determining the
amount of taxes that the eligible local taxing entity levied during the
taxable year and dividing this amount by the total tax levied by all of
the eligible local taxing entities during the year. Each eligible
entity's resulting fraction shall then be multiplied by the amount of
revenue available for distribution pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this
section to determine the portion of such revenue due each local taxing
entity.
(4) The Department of Revenue shall not retain any revenue collected
pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 for distribution, use, transfer,
pledge, or allocation to or from the General Fund.
Sec. 3. Original section 33-114, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 77-6204, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
-3-

LB770 LB770
2026 2026
repealed.
-4-